Utah statutes.
53A-29-105.   Recognition of participation in internship program.

A cooperating employer may be given appropriate recognition by a school, including the posting of the employer's name and a short description of the employer's business in an appropriate location on school property, or publication of that information in official publications of the school or school district.

